New Jersey, session 222, S347.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The State Board of Education shall recognize the Armed Services Vocational Aptitude Battery-Armed Forces Qualifying Test (ASVAB-AFQT) as an alternative assessment for the high school graduation proficiency test requirement. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.